California statutes. Penal Code
-------------------------------------------

16535.

(a) As used in this part, “firearm safety certificate” means a certificate issued by the Department of Justice pursuant to Sections 31610 to 31700, inclusive, or pursuant to former Article 8 (commencing with Section 12800) of Chapter 6 of Title 2 of Part 4, as that article was operative at any time from January 1, 2003, until it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 761, Sec. 1.   (SB 683)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16540.

As used in this part, “firearm safety device” means a device other than a gun safe that locks and is designed to prevent children and unauthorized users from firing a firearm. The device may be installed on a firearm, be incorporated into the design of the firearm, or prevent access to the firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 103, Sec. 4.   (AB 1798)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

16550.

As used in this part, “firearm transaction record” is a record containing the same information referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 478.124, Section 478.124a, and subdivision (e) of Section 478.125 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16560.

Use of the phrase “firing requirement for handguns” is governed by Section 31905.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16570.

As used in this part, “flechette dart” means a dart, capable of being fired from a firearm, that measures approximately one inch in length, with tail fins that take up approximately five-sixteenths of an inch of the body.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16575.

(a) Except as stated in subdivision (c), the following provisions are continuations of provisions that were included in former Article 4 (commencing with Section 12070) of Chapter 1 of Title 2 of Part 4, entitled “Licenses to Sell Firearms,” when that article was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010: 

(1) Section 16130. 

(2) Subdivision (b) of Section 16170, to the extent that it continues former Sections 12078 and 12085, as those sections read when they were repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010. 

(3) Section 16230. 

(4) Section 16400. 

(5) Section 16450, to the extent that it continues subdivision (a) of former Section 12086, as that subdivision read when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010.

(6) Subdivisions (b) and (d) of Section 16520, to the extent that they continue subdivision (e) of former Section 12085, as that subdivision read when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010. 

(7) Subdivision (g) of Section 16520. 

(8) Section 16550. 

(9) Section 16620. 

(10) Section 16720. 

(11) Section 16730. 

(12) Section 16740, to the extent that it continues subdivision (b) of former Section 12079, as that subdivision read when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010. 

(13) Section 16800. 

(14) Section 16810. 

(15) Section 16960. 

(16) Section 16990. 

(17) Section 17110. 

(18) Section 17310. 

(19) Sections 26500 to 26588, inclusive. 

(20) Sections 26600 to 29150, inclusive. 

(21) Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29500) of Division 8 of Title 4. 

(22) Section 30105. 

(23) Sections 30150 to 30165, inclusive. 

(24) Sections 31705 to 31830, inclusive. 

(25) Section 32315. 

(26) Section 34205. 

(27) Sections 34350 to 34370, inclusive. 

(b) Except as stated in subdivision (c), the provisions listed in subdivision (a) may be referred to as “former Article 4 of Chapter 1 provisions.” 

(c) Subdivision (a) does not include any provision that was first codified in one of the specified numerical ranges after the effective date of the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16580.

(a) Except as stated in subdivision (c), the following provisions are continuations of provisions that were included in former Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12000) of Title 2 of Part 4, entitled “Firearms,” when that chapter was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010: 

(1) Sections 12001 to 12022.95, inclusive. 

(2) Sections 16120 to 16140, inclusive. 

(3) Subdivision (b) of Section 16170, to the extent it continues former Sections 12001, 12060, 12078, 12085, and 12088.8, as those sections read when they were repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010. 

(4) Subdivision (c) of Section 16170. 

(5) Section 16190. 

(6) Sections 16220 to 16240, inclusive. 

(7) Section 16250, to the extent it continues former Section 12001, as that section read when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010. 

(8) Section 16260. 

(9) Sections 16320 to 16340, inclusive. 

(10) Section 16360. 

(11) Sections 16400 to 16410, inclusive. 

(12) Section 16430. 

(13) Section 16450, to the extent it continues former Sections 12060 and 12086, as those sections read when they were repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010. 

(14) Subdivision (b) of Section 16460. 

(15) Section 16470. 

(16) Section 16490. 

(17) Subdivision (a) of Section 16520, to the extent it
 continues former Section 12001, as that section read when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010. 

(18) Subdivisions (b) to (g), inclusive, of Section 16520. 

(19) Sections 16530 to 16550, inclusive. 

(20) Section 16570. 

(21) Sections 16600 to 16640, inclusive. 

(22) Section 16650, to the extent it continues former Section 12060, as that section read when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010. 

(23) Section 16662, to the extent it continues former Section 12060, as that section read when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010. 

(24) Sections 16670 to 16690, inclusive. 

(25) Sections 16720 to 16760, inclusive. 

(26) Sections 16800 and 16810. 

(27) Sections 16830 to 16870, inclusive. 

(28) Sections 16920 to 16960, inclusive. 

(29) Sections 16990 and 17000. 

(30) Sections 17020 to 17070, inclusive. 

(31) Section 17090, to the extent it continues former Section 12020, as that section read when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010. 

(32) Section 17110. 

(33) Section 17125. 

(34) Section 17160. 

(35) Sections 17170 to 17200, inclusive. 

(36) Sections 17270 to 17290, inclusive. 

(37) Sections 17310 and 17315. 

(38) Sections 17330 to 17505, inclusive. 

(39) Sections 17515 to 18500, inclusive. 

(40) Sections 19100 to 19290, inclusive. 

(41) Sections 20200 to 21390, inclusive. 

(42) Sections
 21790 to 22490, inclusive. 

(43) Sections 23500 to 30290, inclusive. 

(44) Sections 30345 to 30365, inclusive. 

(45) Sections 31500 to 31590, inclusive. 

(46) Sections 31705 to 31830, inclusive. 

(47) Sections 32310 to 32450, inclusive. 

(48) Sections 32900 to 33320, inclusive. 

(49) Sections 33600 to 34370, inclusive. 

(b) Except as stated in subdivision (c), the provisions listed in subdivision (a) may be referred to as “former Chapter 1 provisions.” 

(c) Subdivision (a) does not include any provision that was first codified in one of the specified numerical ranges after the effective date of the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16585.

(a) Except as stated in subdivision (d), the following provisions are continuations of provisions that were included in former Section 12078, as that section read when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010: 

(1) Subdivision (b) of Section 16170, as it pertains to former Section 12078, as that section read when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons
 Recodification Act of 2010. 

(2) Section 16720. 

(3) Subdivision (a) of Section 16730, as it pertains to former Section 12078, as that section read when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010. 

(4) Subdivision (b) of Section 16730. 

(5) Section 16990. 

(6) Sections 26600 to 26615, inclusive. 

(7) Sections 26950 to 27140, inclusive. 

(8) Sections 27400 to 27415, inclusive. 

(9) Subdivision (b) of Section 27505, as it pertains to former Section 12078, as that section read
 when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010.

(10) Sections 27600 to 28000, inclusive. 

(11) Sections 28400 to 28415, inclusive. 

(12) Sections 30150 to 30165, inclusive. 

(13) Sections 31705 to 31830, inclusive. 

(14) Sections 34355 to 34370, inclusive. 

(b) Except as stated in subdivision (d), the provisions listed in subdivision (a) may be referred to as “former Section 12078 provisions.” 

(c) Except as stated in subdivision (d), the following provisions are continuations of provisions that were included in subdivision (a) of former
 Section 12078, as that subdivision read when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010: 

(1) Sections 26600 to 26615, inclusive. 

(2) Section 26950. 

(3) Sections 27050 to 27065, inclusive. 

(4) Sections 27400 to 27415, inclusive. 

(5) Sections 27600 to 27615, inclusive. 

(6) Section 27650. 

(7) Sections 27850 to 27860, inclusive. 

(8) Sections 28400 to 28415, inclusive. 

(9) Sections 30150 to 30165, inclusive.
 

(10) Sections 31705 to 31735, inclusive. 

(11) Sections 34355 to 34370, inclusive. 

(d) Subdivisions (a) and (c) do not include any provision that was first codified in one of the specified numerical ranges after the effective date of the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16590.

As used in this part, “generally prohibited weapon” means any of the following:

(a) An air gauge knife, as prohibited by Section 20310.

(b) Ammunition that contains or consists of a flechette dart, as prohibited by Section 30210.

(c) A ballistic knife, as prohibited by Section 21110.

(d) A belt buckle knife, as prohibited by Section 20410.

(e) A bullet containing or carrying an explosive agent, as prohibited by Section 30210.

(f) A camouflaging firearm container, as prohibited by Section 24310.

(g) A cane gun, as prohibited by Section 24410.

(h) A cane sword, as prohibited by Section 20510.

(i) A concealed dirk or dagger, as prohibited by Section 21310.

(j) A concealed explosive substance, other than fixed ammunition, as prohibited by Section 19100.

(k) A firearm that is not immediately recognizable as a firearm, as prohibited by Section 24510.

(l) A large-capacity magazine, as prohibited by Section 32310.

(m) A leaded cane or an instrument or weapon of the kind commonly known as a billy, blackjack, sandbag, sandclub, sap,
 or slungshot, as prohibited by Section 22210.

(n) A lipstick case knife, as prohibited by Section 20610.

(o) Metal knuckles, as prohibited by Section 21810.

(p) A metal military practice handgrenade or a metal replica handgrenade, as prohibited by Section 19200.

(q) A multiburst trigger activator, as prohibited by Section 32900.

(r) A shobi-zue, as prohibited by Section 20710.

(s) A short-barreled rifle or short-barreled shotgun, as prohibited by Section 33215.

(t) A
 shuriken, as prohibited by Section 22410.

(u) An unconventional pistol, as prohibited by Section 31500.

(v) An undetectable firearm, as prohibited by Section 24610.

(w) A wallet gun, as prohibited by Section 24710.

(x) A writing pen knife, as prohibited by Section 20910.

(y) A zip gun, as prohibited by Section 33600.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 434, Sec. 22.   (SB 827)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16600.

As used in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 4 of Title 4, “great bodily injury” means a significant or substantial physical injury.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16610.

As used in this part, “gun safe” means a locking container that fully contains and secures one or more firearms, and that meets the standards for gun safes adopted pursuant to Section 23650.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16620.

As used in this part, “Gun Show Trader” means a person described in Section 26525.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16630.

As used in this part, “gunsmith” means any person who is licensed as a dealer pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto, who is engaged primarily in the business of repairing firearms, or making or fitting special barrels, stocks, or trigger mechanisms to firearms, or the agent or employee of that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16640.

(a) As used in this part, “handgun” means any pistol, revolver, or firearm capable of being concealed upon the person. 

(b) Nothing shall prevent a device defined as a “handgun” from also being found to be a short-barreled rifle or a short-barreled shotgun.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16650.

(a) As used in this part, “handgun ammunition” means ammunition principally for use in pistols, revolvers, and other firearms capable of being concealed upon the person, notwithstanding that the ammunition may also be used in some rifles. 

(b) As used in Section 30312 and in Article 3 (commencing with Section 30345) of Chapter 1 of Division 10 of Title 4, “handgun ammunition”
 does not include either of the following: 

(1) Ammunition designed and intended to be used in an antique firearm. 

(2) Blanks.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16660.

As used in this part, “handgun ammunition designed primarily to penetrate metal or armor” means any ammunition, except a shotgun shell or ammunition primarily designed for use in a rifle, that is designed primarily to penetrate a body vest or body shield, and has either of the following characteristics: 

(a) Has projectile or projectile core constructed entirely, excluding the presence of traces of
 other substances, from one or a combination of tungsten alloys, steel, iron, brass, beryllium copper, or depleted uranium, or any equivalent material of similar density or hardness. 

(b) Is primarily manufactured or designed, by virtue of its shape, cross-sectional density, or any coating applied thereto, including, but not limited to, ammunition commonly known as “KTW ammunition,” to breach or penetrate a body vest or body shield when fired from a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16670.

As used in this part, “handgun safety certificate” means a certificate issued by the Department of Justice pursuant to Sections 31610 to 31700, inclusive, or pursuant to former Article 8 (commencing with Section 12800) of Chapter 6 of Title 2 of Part 4, as that article was operative at any time from January 1, 2003, until it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16680.

As used in this part, “hard wooden knuckles” means any device or instrument made wholly or partially of wood or paper products that is not metal knuckles, that is worn for purposes of offense or defense in or on the hand, and that either protects the wearer’s hand while striking a blow, or increases the force of impact from the blow or injury to the individual receiving the blow. The composite materials, wood, or paper products contained in the device may help
 support the hand or fist, provide a shield to protect it, or consist of projections or studs that would contact the individual receiving a blow.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16685.

As used in this part, a valid and unexpired “hunting license” means a hunting license issued by the Department of Fish and Wildlife pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 3031) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Fish and Game Code, for which the time period authorized for the taking of birds or mammals has commenced but not expired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 250, Sec. 5.   (SB 715)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16690.

(a) As used in Sections 25650 and 26020, Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4, Article 3 (commencing with Section 25900) of Chapter 3 of Division 5 of Title 4, and Section 32406, as added by Chapter 58 of the Statutes of 2016 and as added by Proposition 63, “honorably retired” includes:

(1) A peace officer who has qualified for, and has accepted, a service or disability retirement.

(2) A retired level I reserve officer who meets the requirements specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 26300.

(b) As used in
 this section, “honorably retired” does not include an officer who has agreed to a service retirement in lieu of termination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 63, Sec. 1.   (AB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16700.

(a) (1) As used in this part, “imitation firearm” means any BB device, toy gun, replica of a firearm, or other device that is so substantially similar in coloration and overall appearance to an existing firearm as to lead a reasonable person to perceive that the device is a firearm.

(2) “Imitation firearm” also includes, but is not limited to, a protective case for a cellular telephone that is so substantially similar in coloration and overall appearance to an existing firearm as to lead a reasonable person to perceive that
 the case is a firearm.

(b) As used in Section 20165, “imitation firearm” does not include any of the following:

(1) A nonfiring collector’s replica that is historically significant, and is offered for sale in conjunction with a wall plaque or presentation case.

(2) A spot marker gun which expels a projectile that is greater than 10mm caliber.

(3) A BB device that expels a projectile, such as a BB or pellet, that is other than 6mm or 8mm caliber.

(4) A BB device that is an airsoft gun that expels a projectile, such as a BB or pellet, that is 6mm or 8mm caliber which meets the following:

(A) If the airsoft gun is configured as a handgun, in addition to the blaze orange ring on the barrel required by federal law, the airsoft gun has a trigger guard that has fluorescent coloration over the entire guard, and there is a two
 centimeter wide adhesive band around the circumference of the protruding pistol grip that has fluorescent coloration.

(B) If the airsoft gun is configured as a rifle or long gun, in addition to the blaze orange ring on the barrel required by federal law, the airsoft gun has a trigger guard that has fluorescent coloration over the entire guard, and there is a two centimeter wide adhesive band with fluorescent coloring around the circumference of any two of the following:

(i) The protruding pistol grip.

(ii) The buttstock.

(iii) A protruding ammunition magazine or clip.

(5) A device where the entire exterior surface of the device is white, bright red, bright orange, bright yellow, bright green, bright blue, bright pink, or bright purple, either singly or as the predominant color in combination with other colors in any pattern, or where the entire device is constructed of
 transparent or translucent materials which permits unmistakable observation of the device’s complete contents.

(c) The adhesive bands described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) shall be applied in a manner not intended for removal, and shall be in place on the airsoft gun prior to sale to a customer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 198, Sec. 1.   (AB 1798)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

16720.

As used in this part, “immediate family member” means either of the following relationships: 

(a) Parent and child. 

(b) Grandparent and grandchild.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16730.

(a) As used in Section 31815 and in Division 6 (commencing with Section 26500) of Title 4, “infrequent” means both of the following are true:

(1) The person conducts less than six transactions per calendar year.

(2) The person sells, leases, or transfers no more than 50 total firearms per calendar year.

(b) As used in this section, “transaction” means a single sale, lease, or transfer of any number of firearms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 738, Sec. 5.   (SB 376)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

16740.

As used in this part, “large-capacity magazine” means any ammunition feeding device with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds, but shall not be construed to include any of the following: 

(a) A feeding device that has been permanently altered so that it cannot accommodate more than 10 rounds. 

(b) A .22 caliber tube ammunition
 feeding device. 

(c) A tubular magazine that is contained in a lever-action firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16745.

As used in Sections 25105, 25135, and 25145, “authorized user” means an individual who is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm and who meets either of the following requirements:

(a) The individual is the lawful owner of the firearm.

(b) The individual has been lawfully authorized by the lawful owner of the firearm to access, possess, and use the firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

16750.

(a) As used in Section 25400, “lawful possession of the firearm” means that the person who has possession or custody of the firearm either lawfully owns the firearm or has the permission of the lawful owner or a person who otherwise has apparent authority to possess or have custody of the firearm. A person who takes a firearm without the permission of the lawful owner or without the permission of a person who has lawful custody of the firearm does not have lawful possession of the firearm.

(b) As used in Article 2 (commencing with Section 25850), Article 3 (commencing with Section 25900), and Article 4 (commencing with Section 26000) of Chapter 3 of Division 5 of Title 4,
 Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 26350) of Division 5 of Title 4, and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 26400) of Division 5 of Title 4, “lawful possession of the firearm” means that the person who has possession or custody of the firearm either lawfully acquired and lawfully owns the firearm or has the permission of the lawful owner or person who otherwise has apparent authority to possess or have custody of the firearm. A person who takes a firearm without the permission of the lawful owner or without the permission of a person who has lawful custody of the firearm does not have lawful possession of the firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 700, Sec. 6.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

16760.

As used in this part, a “leaded cane” means a staff, crutch, stick, rod, pole, or similar device, unnaturally weighted with lead.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16770.

As used in this part, “less lethal ammunition” means any ammunition that satisfies both of the following requirements: 

(a) It is designed to be used in any less lethal weapon or any other kind of weapon (including, but not limited to, any firearm, pistol, revolver, shotgun, rifle, or spring, compressed air, or compressed gas weapon). 

(b) When used in a less lethal weapon or other weapon, it is designed to immobilize, incapacitate, or stun a human being through the infliction of any less than lethal impairment of physical condition, function, or senses, including physical pain or discomfort.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16780.

As used in this part:

(a) “Less lethal weapon” means any device that is designed to or that has been converted to expel or propel less lethal ammunition by any action, mechanism, or process for the purpose of incapacitating, immobilizing, or stunning a human being through the infliction of any less than lethal impairment of physical condition, function, or senses, including physical pain or
 discomfort. It is not necessary that a weapon leave any lasting or permanent incapacitation, discomfort, pain, or other injury or disability in order to qualify as a less lethal weapon. 

(b) Less lethal weapon includes the frame or receiver of any weapon described in subdivision (a), but does not include any of the following unless the part or weapon has been converted as described in subdivision (a): 

(1) Pistol, revolver, or firearm. 

(2) Machinegun. 

(3) Rifle or shotgun using fixed ammunition consisting of standard primer and powder and not capable of being concealed upon the person. 

(4) A pistol, rifle, or shotgun that is a firearm having a barrel less than 0.18 inches in diameter
 and that is designed to expel a projectile by any mechanical means or by compressed air or gas. 

(5) When used as designed or intended by the manufacturer, any weapon that is commonly regarded as a toy gun, and that as a toy gun is incapable of inflicting any impairment of physical condition, function, or senses. 

(6) A destructive device. 

(7) A tear gas weapon. 

(8) A bow or crossbow designed to shoot arrows. 

(9) A device commonly known as a slingshot. 

(10) A device designed for the firing of stud cartridges, explosive rivets, or similar industrial ammunition. 

(11) A device designed for signaling, illumination, or safety. 

(12) An assault weapon.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16790.

As used in Article 5 (commencing with Section 30900) and Article 7 (commencing with Section 31050) of Chapter 2 of Division 10 of Title 4, “licensed gun dealer” means a person who is licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, and who has a permit to sell assault weapons or .50 BMG rifles pursuant to Section 31005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16800.

As used in this part, “licensed gun show producer” means a person who has been issued a certificate of eligibility by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 27200. No regulations shall be required to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16810.

As used in Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2 of Division 6 of Title 4, “licensed premises,” “licensee’s business premises,” or “licensee’s place of business” means the building designated in the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16820.

(a) For purposes of the provisions listed in Section 16580, use of the term “licensee” is governed by Section 26700. 

(b) For purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29030) of Division 7 of Title 4, use of the term “licensee” is governed by Section 29030.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16822.

Use of the term “licensee’s business premises” is governed by Section 16810.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16824.

Use of the term “licensee’s place of business” is governed by Section 16810.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16830.

As used in this part, a “lipstick case knife” means a knife enclosed within and made an integral part of a lipstick case.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16840.

(a) As used in Section 25800, a firearm shall be deemed to be “loaded” whenever both the firearm and the unexpended ammunition capable of being discharged from the firearm are in the immediate possession of the same person. 

(b) As used in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 4 of Title 4, in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 25400,
 and in Sections 25850 to 26055, inclusive, 

(1) A firearm shall be deemed to be “loaded” when there is an unexpended cartridge or shell, consisting of a case that holds a charge of powder and a bullet or shot, in, or attached in any manner to, the firearm, including, but not limited to, in the firing chamber, magazine, or clip thereof attached to the firearm. 

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a muzzle-loader firearm shall be deemed to be loaded when it is capped or primed and has a powder charge and ball or shot in the barrel or cylinder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16850.

As used in this part, “locked container” means a secure container that is fully enclosed and locked by a padlock, keylock, combination lock, or similar locking device. The term “locked container” does not include the utility or glove compartment of a motor vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 103, Sec. 5.   (AB 1798)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

16860.

As used in Sections 16850, 25105, and 25205, “locking device” means a device that is designed to prevent a firearm from functioning and, when applied to the firearm, renders the firearm inoperable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16865.

As used in Section 26860, “long gun” means any firearm that is not a handgun or a machinegun.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 761, Sec. 2.   (SB 683)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

16870.

As used in this part, “long-gun safe” means a locking container designed to fully contain and secure a rifle or shotgun, which has a locking system consisting of either a mechanical combination lock or an electronic combination lock that has at least 1,000 possible unique combinations consisting of a minimum of three numbers, letters, or symbols per combination, and is not listed on the roster maintained pursuant to Section 23655.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16880.

(a) As used in this part, “machinegun” means any weapon that shoots, is designed to shoot, or can readily be restored to shoot, automatically more than one shot, without manual reloading, by a single function of the trigger.

(b) The term “machinegun” also includes the frame or receiver of any weapon described in subdivision (a), any part designed and intended solely and exclusively, or combination of parts designed and intended, for use in converting a weapon into a machinegun, and any combination of parts from which a machinegun can be assembled if those parts are in the possession or under the control of a person.

(c) The term “machinegun” also includes any weapon deemed by the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives as readily convertible to a machinegun under Chapter 53 (commencing with Section 5801) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(d) The term “machinegun” also includes any machinegun-convertible pistol equipped with a pistol converter, as defined in Section 17015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   (AB 1127)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

16885.

(a) As used in this part, “machinegun-convertible pistol” means any semiautomatic pistol with a cruciform trigger bar that can be readily converted by hand or with common household tools, as defined in Section 4082 of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations, into a machinegun by the installation or attachment of a pistol converter as a replacement for the slide’s backplate without any additional engineering, machining, or modification of the pistol’s trigger mechanism.

(b) A machinegun-convertible pistol does not include a hammer-fired semiautomatic pistol or striker-fired semiautomatic pistol lacking a cruciform trigger bar, which instead has a trigger bar
 that is shielded from interference by a pistol converter.

(c) A polymer notch or other piece of polymer molded into the rear of the pistol frame does not prevent ready conversion into a machinegun and will not prevent a pistol from qualifying under this definition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 572, Sec. 3.   (AB 1127)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

16890.

As used in Section 30515, “magazine” means any ammunition feeding device.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16900.

As used in this part, “magazine disconnect mechanism” means a mechanism that prevents a semiautomatic pistol that has a detachable magazine from operating to strike the primer of ammunition in the firing chamber when a detachable magazine is not inserted in the semiautomatic pistol.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16920.

As used in this part, “metal knuckles” means any device or instrument made wholly or partially of metal that is worn for purposes of offense or defense in or on the hand and that either protects the wearer’s hand while striking a blow or increases the force of impact from the blow or injury to the individual receiving the blow. The metal contained in the device may help support the hand or fist, provide a shield to protect it, or consist of projections or studs
 which would contact the individual receiving a blow.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16930.

(a) As used in this part, a “multiburst trigger activator” means either of the following:

(1) A device designed or redesigned to be attached to, built into, or used in conjunction with, a semiautomatic firearm, which allows the firearm to discharge two or more shots in a burst by activating the device.

(2) A manual or power-driven trigger activating device constructed and designed so that when attached to, built into, or used in conjunction with, a semiautomatic firearm it increases the rate of fire of that firearm.

(b) “Multiburst trigger activator” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following devices:

(1) A device that uses a spring, piston, or similar mechanism to push back against the recoil of a firearm, thereby moving the firearm in a back-and-forth motion and facilitating the rapid reset and activation of the trigger by a stationary finger. These devices are commonly known as bump stocks, bump fire stocks, or bump fire stock attachments.

(2) A device placed within the trigger guard of a firearm that uses a spring to push back against the recoil of the firearm causing the finger in the trigger guard to move back and forth and rapidly activate the trigger. These devices are commonly known as burst triggers.

(3) A mechanical device that activates the trigger of the firearm in rapid succession by turning a crank. These devices are commonly known as trigger cranks, gat cranks, gat triggers, or trigger actuators.

(4) Any aftermarket trigger or trigger system that, if installed, allows more than one round to be fired with a single depression of the trigger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 795, Sec. 1.   (SB 1346)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16940.

As used in this part, “nunchaku” means an instrument consisting of two or more sticks, clubs, bars, or rods to be used as handles, connected by a rope, cord, wire, or chain, in the design of a weapon used in connection with the practice of a system of self-defense such as karate.
